Hawaii, session 2025, SB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 235-111, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) General rule.  The amount of income taxes imposed by this chapter (also the amount of income taxes imposed by any preceding law of the State) and the liability of any employer in respect of wages, shall be assessed or levied and the overpayment, if any, shall be credited within three years after filing of the return for the taxable year, or within three years of the due date prescribed for the filing of the return, whichever is later.  No proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of the taxes or the enforcement of the liability shall be begun after the expiration of the period.  Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed." SECTION 2. Section 237-40, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  General rule. The amount of excise taxes imposed by this chapter shall be assessed or levied within three years after the annual return was filed, or within three years of the due date prescribed for the filing of the return, whichever is later, and no proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of any of the taxes shall be begun after the expiration of the period.  Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State if the period of absence is for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed." SECTION 3. Section 237D-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) Except as otherwise provided by this section, the amount of taxes imposed by this chapter shall be assessed or levied within three years after the annual return was filed, or within three years of the due date prescribed for the filing of the return, whichever is later, and no proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of any of the taxes shall be begun after the expiration of the period.  Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State if the period of absence is for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed." SECTION 4. Section 238-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State if the period of absence is for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed." SECTION 5. Section 243-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The amount of license taxes imposed by this chapter shall be assessed or levied, or the overpayment, if any, shall be credited within three years after filing of the monthly statement, or within three years of the due date prescribed for the filing of the statement, whichever is later.  No proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of the taxes or the enforcement of the liability shall begin after the expiration of the three-year period. Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State if the period of absence is for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed. As to all tax payments for which a refund or credit is not authorized by this section (including, without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing, cases of unconstitutionality), the remedies provided by appeal or by section 40-35 are exclusive." SECTION 6. Section 247-6.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§247-6.5  Limitation period for assessment, levy, collection, or credit.  The amount of conveyance taxes imposed by this chapter shall be assessed or levied, and the overpayment, if any, shall be credited within three years after filing of the certificate prescribed by section 247-6. No proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of the taxes shall be begun after the expiration of the three-year period.  Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State if the period of absence is for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed. In the case of a false or fraudulent certificate filed with the intent to evade tax, or of a failure to file a certificate, the tax may be assessed or levied at any time." SECTION 7. Section 251-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) Except as otherwise provided by this section, the amount of surcharge taxes imposed by this chapter shall be assessed or levied within three years after the annual return was filed, or within three years of the due date prescribed for the filing of the return, whichever is later, and no proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of any [such] surcharge taxes shall begin after the expiration of the period.  Where the assessment of the tax imposed by this chapter has been made within the period of limitation applicable thereto, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court under chapter 231; provided that the levy is made or the proceeding was begun within fifteen years after the assessment of the tax.  For any tax that has been assessed [prior to] before July 1, 2009, the levy or proceeding shall be barred after June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, the limitation on collection after assessment in this section shall be suspended for the period: (1)  The taxpayer agrees to suspend the period; (2)  The assets of the taxpayer are in control or custody of a court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or any state, and for six months thereafter; (3)  An offer in compromise under section 231-3(10) is pending; [and] (4)  During which the taxpayer is outside the State if the period of absence is for a continuous period of at least six months; provided that if at the time of the taxpayer's return to the State the period of limitations on collection after assessment would expire before the expiration of six months from the date of the taxpayer's return, the period shall not expire before the expiration of the six months[.]; and (5)  An appeal of the assessment is pending before the taxation board of review or the tax appeal court, beginning on the date the notice of appeal is filed and concluding on the date a final decision is issued or the case is withdrawn or dismissed." SECTION 8.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval and shall suspend the statute of limitations on collections of assessments that were on appeal before the effective date of this Act, from the filing date of the notices of appeal to the conclusion, dismissal, or withdrawal of the appeals.